Massachusetts, session 194th, H325.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definition:- 
“Venue”, any entertainment facility, property, building, structure, or place that is 
primarily designed and used for live sporting competitions or contests, shows, performances or 
other entertainment in which the occupancy exceeds over 4,900. 
SECTION 2. Section 12 of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section in line XX after the words “ 
and approve in writing”:- 
However, no alcoholic beverage shall be sold at any sporting venue, stadium, arena or 
other venue as defined in this chapter unless such sale is directly conducted and directly 
supervised by an employee of a holder of the appropriate License issued by the Alcoholic 
Beverage Control Commission. Furthermore, no patron of any venue shall gain access to any 

of 2 13 alcoholic beverage until such sale has been finalized and the beverage has been served to the 
patron by such an employee.”